web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.aff
#defect de plural
SFX f Y 69
SFX f   a     a       a              s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   a     a-i       a
SFX f   a     o       a
SFX f   eala eli      eala           s.f.sg.dat.neart
SFX f   eala elii      eala           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   ura urii      ura              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   ura uri       ura             s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   ca cii      ca                 s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   ca ci       ca                 s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   ala elii      [^e]ala           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   ala eli       [^e]ala           s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   da zi da                         s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   da zii da                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   e ea      ire                     s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e eo      ire
SFX f   e ea-i      ire
SFX f   e i      ire                       s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f   e ii      ire                      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   0 a      oare                   s.f.sg.art
SFX f   0 o      oare
SFX f   0 a-i      oare
SFX f   are ri      oare                s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   are rii      oare               s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   are   arii    [^oi]are       s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   are   ari     [^oi]are       s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f   are   area   [^oi]are      s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   are   area-i   [^oi]are
SFX f   are   areo   [^oi]are
SFX f   e     ea     ere            s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ea-i     ere            s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     eo     ere            s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ii      ere            s.f.sg.dat.
SFX f   e     i       ere            s.f.sg.neart.dat.
SFX f  za   ze   za     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  za   zei   za     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ta   te   ta     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  ta   tei   ta     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ta   te   ta     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  ta   tei   ta     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  na   ne   na     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  na   nei   na     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ma   me   ma     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  ma   mei   ma     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  fa   fe   fa     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  fa   fei   fa     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  va   ve   va     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  va   vei   va     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ra   re   [^u]ra     s.f.sg.neart.dat
SFX f  ra   rei   [^u]ra     s.f.sg.art.dat
SFX f  ie   ia    ie         s.f.sg.art.
SFX f  ie   ia-i    ie
SFX f  ie   io    ie
SFX f  ie   iei    ie         s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f  ie   ii    ie         s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   0     a   ime       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   0     a-i   ime
SFX f   0     o   ime
SFX f   e     i   ime       s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   e     ii   ime       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   ate   atea    ate       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   ate   atea-i    ate
SFX f   ate   ateo    ate
SFX f   ate   atii    ate       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   ate   ati     ate       s.f.sg.dat.neart.
SFX f   0     a      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   0     a-i      [iu]ne
SFX f   0     o      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.art.
SFX f   e     ii      [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.art.
SFX f   e     i       [iu]ne       s.f.sg.dat.neart.


SFX F Y 53
SFX F   a     a       a              s.f.sg.art.
SFX F   a     a-i       a
SFX F   a     o       a
SFX F   eala elii      eala           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   eala eli       eala           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   eala  elile     eala         s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   eala  elilor   eala          s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ura urii      ura              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ura uri       ura             s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ura  urile     ura            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ura  urilor   ura             s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ca cii      ca                 s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ca ci       ca                 s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ca cile     ca                 s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ca cilor    ca                 s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ala elii      [^e]ala           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ala eli       [^e]ala           s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ala elile     [^e]ala           s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ala elilor    [^e]ala           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   da zi da                         s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   da zii da                        s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   da zile da                       s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   da zilor da                      s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   e ea      ire                     s.f.sg.art.
SFX F   e eo      ire
SFX F   e ea-i      ire
SFX F   e i      ire                       s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   e ii      ire                      s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   e ile      ire                    s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   e ilor      ire                   s.f.pl.dat
SFX F   0 a      oare                   s.f.sg.art
SFX F   0 o      oare
SFX F   0 a-i      oare
SFX F   are ri      oare                s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   are rii      oare               s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   are rile      oare             s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   are rilor      oare            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   aja  aji      aja               s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   aja  ajii      aja              s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   aja  ajile      aja            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   aja  ajilor      aja            s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   a  i      ina                    s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   a  ii      ina                   s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   a  ile      ina                 s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   a  ilor      ina                s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ara ari      [^oe]ara          s.f.pl.neart.
SFX F   ara arii     [^oe]ara           s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ara arile    [^oe]ara           s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ara arilor   [^oe]ara           s.f.pl.dat.
SFX F   ara ri      [oe]ara            s.f.pll.neart.
SFX F   ara rii     [oe]ara             s.f.sg.dat.
SFX F   ara rile    [oe]ara            s.f.pl.art.
SFX F   ara rilor   [oe]ara            s.f.pl.dat.
