web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
abolitie/f
acantologie/f
accidentalitate/f
acefalostomie/f
acetoliza/f
acidorezistenta/f
acribie/f
acromantie/f
actinografie/f
acumetrie/f
ademenire/F
ademptiune/f
adinamie/f
adresabilitate/f
aerofagie/f
aeromecanica/f
aerotriangulatie/f
afixare/f
afumatoare/F
agalactie/f
agrafie/f
agroclimatologie/f
agronomie/f
albiciune/f
albineala/F
alcoolmetrie/f
algiditate/f
alienatie/f
alipire/F
altimetrie/f
ambidextrie/f
amfetamina/f
amilodextrina/f
amirosire/F
ampicilina/f
anacronie/f
analgezie/f
androginie/f
anencefalie/f
anglomanie/f
anorganicitate/f
antigravitatie/f
antimalurire/F
antropopatie/f
apostolie/f
arenduire/F
arghirofilie/f
armasie/f
aromire/F
asfintire/F
asiriologie/f
astutie/f
auiala/F
aureomicina/f
autofonie/f
autolinistire/F
auxopatie/f
asteptatura/F
balcanologie/f
bejanarire/F
belota/f
bicameralitate/f
biciuiala/F
bioluminiscenta/f
bisexualitate/f
blansiruire/F
bodoganeala/F
bombanire/F
bosorogeala/F
bradichinezie/f
bronhofonie/f
bruftuire/F
buchiseala/F
buiurdisire/F
burfuiala/F
butirina/f
buseala/F
bazaiala/F
balmajire/F
bananaire/F
cadranura/F
calinerie/f
capelatura/F
capilarodilatatie/f
caretasie/f
cataforeza/f
cefalina/f
cercuiala/F
cerebralitate/f
chiaburime/f
chibzuire/F
cianoza/f
cihaire/F
ciopartire/F
citochimie/f
clefaire/F
clancaire/F
coacervatie/f
colangiografie/f
colcotire/F
combustibilitate/f
comunicabilitate/f
confutatie/f
contextualitate/f
contra-tesatura/F
coproscleroza/f
corporalitate/f
coraslire/F
cosmonomie/f
criogenie/f
cronicitate/f
cruseala/F
cursivitate/f
cutremuratura/F
calcatura/F
carpanosie/f
carausire/F
dactiloscopie/f
deferenta/f
dendrometrie/f
deosebire/F
despriponire/F
destoinicie/f
dezmintire/F
diaconie/f
digitatie/f
discursivitate/f
distribuire/F
doctorantura/f
dramuire/F
dumnezeire/f
dardaiala/F
echiplanatie/f
ectogeneza/f
egumenie/f
electrochirurgie/f
electronopunctura/f
electropunctura/F
eligibilitate/f
enantiotropie/f
endosmoza/f
eozinofilie/f
ergodicitate/f
esentialitate/f
etnogeneza/f
evaginatie/f
exponentialitate/f
farmacodinamie/f
fenilamina/f
ferestuire/F
fiabilitate/f
fitocenologie/f
fizioterapie/f
flexura/F
focalizatie/f
fotobiologie/f
fotogrammetrie/f
fotogravura/F
frigiditate/f
fuituiala/F
futurologie/f
fasaitura/F
galvanoterapie/f
gangliocultura/F
geocancerologie/f
geospeologie/f
ghiortaitura/F
ginecografie/f
glosolalie/f
granulie/f
grinda/F
gusterita/f
galcevire/F
gavozdire/F
heghemonie/f
heroina/f
hidroenergie/f
higiena/f
hipnopatie/f
histidina/f
hodorogeala/F
hormonologie/f
hrinca/F
harca/F
halalaire/F
iconolatrie/f
iconoteca/F
ihtiofagie/f
imoderatie/f
impetratie/f
impudoare/f
inaccesibilitate/f
incapacitate/f
incomunicabilitate/f
indemonstrabilitate/f
ineluctabilitate/f
inflexibilitate/f
insesizabilitate/f
intempestivitate/f
intransigenta/f
irationalitate/f
irosire/F
iuta/f
izmenire/F
jargonagrafie/f
jnapaire/F
lactofermentatie/f
lealitate/f
legumeala/F
lezmaiestate/f
lesuiala/F
lipitura/F
locomotie/f
luterna/f
lalaire/F
magnetosfera/f
manita/f
maricultura/F
maturitate/f
metaforicitate/f
metalofizica/F
metensomatoza/f
microbiologie/f
milcuire/F
mineralogie/f
mitografie/f
mituire/F
monofobie/f
morfografie/f
morfolire/F
mucenire/F
muscalime/f
mustire/F
mantuitura/F
marlanime/f
manastire/F
neachitare/f
neadormire/F
necromantie/f
negrime/f
nemilostivire/F
neordine/f
nesolutionare/f
neinfaptuire/F
neintrebuintare/f
nonsalanta/f
nabusire/F
nascocitura/F
obiectivitate/f
obrintitura/F
ofiografie/f
oleicultura/F
omfalopatie/f
onorabilitate/f
orbaltitura/F
organicitate/f
ortoepie/f
ostasime/f
otetire/F
pairie/f
paleopedologie/f
panmieloftizie/f
paraimunitate/f
paroire/F
patognomonie/f
pelvimetrie/f
permutabilitate/f
petrologie/f
picioca/F
piparatura/F
piromantie/f
plenitudine/f
plenuire/F
plutarire/F
pluviometrie/f
poftire/F
polibutadiena/f
pomina/f
poreclire/F
postumitate/f
potoleala/F
preadolescenta/f
prejmuire/F
premunitie/f
pretaluire/F
primordialitate/f
prisoseala/F
proiectivitate/f
proptire/F
prostratie/f
pruncie/f
prafuire/F
psihoigiena/f
pufaiala/F
punctualitate/f
palpaitura/F
pacatuire/F
parasitura/F
pastura/f
radiogeologie/f
rapiditate/f
reacolisire/F
reamirosire/F
reauire/F
rebleojdire/F
rebruftuluire/F
rebuzunarire/F
rebarbierire/F
rechefnire/F
recinstire/F
reclentenire/F
recocarjire/F
recorconire/F
recursivitate/f
recaire/F
redeosebire/F
redogorire/F
redupaire/F
referfenitire/F
refractometrie/f
refrantuzire/F
refaptuire/F
regospodarire/F
regalbinire/F
rehorhaire/F
reharaire/F
reharatire/F
reistorisire/F
rejumulire/F
relinchire/F
remaimutire/F
remijlocire/F
remorocanire/F
remustuire/F
remarsaluire/F
renimicnicire/F
renavodire/F
reoferire/F
reoticnire/F
repezeala/F
repleostire/F
repodobire/F
repovarnire/F
reprigonire/F
reprografie/f
reprostire/F
repustnicire/F
repartinire/F
rerecantarire/F
rereimpartire/F
reranjire/F
rerastire/F
rescobire/F
restrepezire/F
retighelire/F
retrantorire/F
retalancanire/F
reuschire/F
revrajmasire/F
rezapciire/F
rezeflemisire/F
rezilienta/f
rezuruire/F
rezapacire/F
reimpetire/F
reinalbastrire/F
reindesire/F
reingrozire/F
reinraire/F
reinvinuire/F
reserfuire/F
respertuire/F
reticnire/F
rigoare/F
romanitate/f
rototeca/F
rancezire/F
racorire/F
rascroire/F
ratalire/F
raspaluire/F
sacralitate/f
satietate/f
schimbatura/F
scofalcitura/F
scrijelitura/F
scanceala/F
scarmanatura/F
securitate/f
semipermeabilitate/f
servitorime/f
sfeterisire/F
sfadire/F
silvobiologie/f
sinelire/F
sistemicitate/f
smintire/F
snopeala/F
soldatime/f
spatialitate/f
spebeluire/F
spongiozitate/f
spulberatura/F
stereochimie/f
sterpezire/F
stoechiometrie/f
stropitoare/F
straganire/F
starpitura/F
subconstiinta/f
suflura/F
supraconductibilitate/f
santire/F
sarbezire/F
tactilitate/f
tautomerie/f
tehnosfera/f
telepatie/f
telurura/F
teomantie/f
termoliza/f
tiamina/f
ticalosire/F
titrimetrie/f
titulatura/F
torsura/F
transigenta/f
trilateratie/f
tropaita/f
troscanire/F
tulumbuire/F
tampire/F
tarsitoare/F
tamaduire/F
ultrasonoterapie/f
umezeala/F
urda/f
urzicatura/F
validitate/f
velura/f
verva/f
veselitura/F
viitorologie/f
vodca/F
vulnerabilitate/f
vuvuitura/F
vaietatura/F
xilotipie/f
zbenguire/F
zbaraitura/F
zevelca/F
zmangaleala/F
zoomorfie/f
zvecuire/F
zaharire/F
zatonire/F
imbalatura/F
impaslitura/F
inchircire/F
incalcitura/F
indarjire/F
ingraditura/F
ingramadeala/f
innaditura/F
intreciocnire/F
invarteala/F
intarcatoare/F
sifonabilitate/f
sindilire/F
sondromanire/F
spicaluire/F
stiricire/F
surubuire/F
tincuire/F
tapuritura/F
tarica/f
